Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-126
No agency power of member as member.

(RULLCA 301) (a) A member
is not an agent of a limited liability company solely by reason of being a
member.

(b) A person's status
as a member does not prevent or restrict law other than the Nebraska Uniform
Limited Liability Company Act from imposing liability on a limited liability
company because of the person's conduct.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 26.